Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2101
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2101 to 81-2144 shall be known and may be cited as the State Electrical Act.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-571;

Laws 1986, LB 379, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 215, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB65, § 1.